Utah statutes.
32A-6-301 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application requirements.
(1)  Each application for an industrial or manufacturing use permit shall, in
addition to the requirements of Section 32A-6-102, include:
(a)  a nonrefundable $50 application fee;
(b)  a $200 one-time special use permit fee;
(c)  a cash or corporate surety bond in the penal sum of $1,000 payable to the
department, which the permittee has procured and must maintain for so long as
the permittee continues to operate as a special use permittee;
(d)  written consent of the local authority; and
(e)  a floor plan of the immediate area within the premises in which the
applicant proposes that alcoholic products be stored, used, mixed, sold, or
consumed.
(2) (a)  The bond required under Subsection (1) shall be:
(i)  in a form approved by the attorney general; and
(ii)  conditioned upon the permittee's faithful compliance with this title and
the rules of the commission.
(b)  If the surety bond is cancelled due to the permittee's negligence, a $300
reinstatement fee may be assessed.
(c)  No part of any cash or corporate bond posted under this section may be
withdrawn during the period the permit is in effect.
(d)  A bond filed by a permittee may be forfeited if the permit is finally
revoked.
(3)  Any person desiring a special use permit to produce gasohol or any
alcoholic product shall provide evidence to the department that an approved
Notice of Registration of Distilled Spirits Plant and the appropriate permit
from the Federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau has been obtained by
the person.
